Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1922
Department; collect quality assurance
assessment; remit to State Treasurer.

The department shall collect the quality
assurance assessment and remit the assessment to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Fund. No proceeds from the quality
assurance assessment, including the federal match, shall be placed in the
General Fund unless otherwise provided in the Nursing Facility Quality Assurance
Assessment Act.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 22.